Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-2,253.02
Secondary food handling activity, defined.

Secondary food handling activity shall mean operating mobile food units, food pushcarts, or food vending machines or operating any other type of food handling activity as not the primary food handling activity.

Laws 2024, LB262, § 36.
July 19, 2024